Utah statutes.
63M-4-203.   Reports.

(1)  The governor's energy advisor shall report annually to:

(a)  the governor; and

(b)  the Natural Resources, Agriculture, and Environment Interim Committee.

(2)  The report required in Subsection (1) shall:

(a)  summarize the status and development of the state's energy resources;

(b)  address the governor's energy advisor's activities under this part; and

(c)  recommend any energy-related executive or legislative action the governor's energy advisor considers beneficial to the state, including updates to the state energy policy under Section 63M-4-301.



Amended by Chapter 37, 2012 General Session

